Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 26 Interest and Usury

6-26-1.
Legal rate of interest — Post judgment interest.

Post judgment interest on any judgment, and interest in all business transactions where interest is secured or paid, shall be computed at the rate of twelve dollars ($12.00) on one hundred dollars ($100) for one year, unless a different rate is expressly stipulated.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 166, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 201, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 228, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 485, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

6-26-1

; P.L. 1981, ch. 54, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 21, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 555, § 3.

6-26-2.
Maximum rate of interest.

Subject to the provisions of title 19, no person, partnership, association, or corporation loaning money to or negotiating the loan of money for another, except duly licensed pawnbrokers, shall, directly or indirectly, reserve, charge, or take interest on a loan, whether before or after maturity, at a rate that shall exceed the greater of twenty-one percent (21%) per annum or the alternate rate specified in subsection (b) of this section of the unpaid principal balance of the net proceeds of the loan not compounded, nor taken in advance, nor added on to the amount of the loan.

The alternate rate means the rate per annum that is equal to nine percentage points (9%) plus an index that is the domestic prime rate as published in the Money Rates section of The Wall Street Journal on the last business day of each month preceding the later of the date of the debtor’s agreement or the date on which the interest rate is redetermined in accordance with the terms of the debtor’s agreement. If the Wall Street Journal ceases publication of the prime rate, the director of business regulation shall designate a substantially equivalent index. In the event an index is published as a range of rates, then the lowest rate shall be the index.

For purposes of this section, interest shall not be construed to include:

Charges pursuant to chapter 30 of title 27;

Premiums for insurance in an amount not exceeding the reasonable value of property offered as security for a loan against any substantial risk of loss, liability, damage, or destruction in conformity with the insurance laws of this state;

Premiums for insurance providing loss of income or involuntary unemployment coverage if the coverage is not a factor in the approval by the lender of the extension of credit and the debtor gives specific written indication that the cost of this coverage has been conspicuously disclosed to the debtor; that the debtor realizes that the coverage is not a condition for the extension of credit; and that the debtor voluntarily desires the coverage;

Commercial loan commitment or availability fees to assure the availability of a specified amount of credit for a specified period of time or, at the borrower’s option, compensating balances in lieu of the fees;

Reasonable attorney’s fees customarily charged for the preparation of loan, security, or mortgage documents and for the collection of defaulted loans;

Fees for title examination or title insurance;

Other customary and reasonable costs incident to the closing, supervision, and collection of loans in this state; and

Consideration received for the redemption, sale, transfer, or other disposition of equity securities by a small business investment company licensed under the provisions of the “Small Business Investment Act of 1958”, 15 U.S.C. § 631 et seq., as amended, or an entity that would qualify for regulation as a business development company under the provisions of the “Investment Company Act of 1940”, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq., as amended, whether or not the equity securities were acquired by a small business investment company or business development company in connection with or as an incident to the extension of credit.

Any of the preceding charges, if paid or advanced by the lender, may be considered part of the net proceeds of the loan, and if paid by the debtor, shall not be deducted from the net proceeds of the loan.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter or in any other provision of Rhode Island law, the provisions of this chapter shall not be applicable with respect to credit card transactions as defined in chapter 26.1 of this title. Chapter 26.1 shall apply exclusively to all such transactions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section and/or any other provision in this chapter to the contrary, there is no limitation on the rate of interest that may be legally charged for the loan to, or use of money by, a commercial entity, where the amount of money loaned exceeds the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) and where repayment of the loan is not secured by a mortgage against the principal residence of any borrower; provided, that the commercial entity has first obtained a pro forma methods analysis performed by a certified public accountant licensed in the state of Rhode Island indicating that the loan is capable of being repaid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1909, ch. 434, § 1; P.L. 1912, ch. 838, § 1; P.L. 1923, ch. 228, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 485, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

6-26-2

; P.L. 1966, ch. 269, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 173, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 17, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 471, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 330, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 359, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 58; P.L. 1996, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 237, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 15.

6-26-3.
Criminal usury.

Any person, who, on his or her own behalf or on behalf of any other person, partnership, corporation, or association, shall willfully and knowingly violate any of the provisions of §

6-26-2

shall be guilty of criminal usury and shall be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1909, ch. 434, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 228, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 485, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

6-26-3

; P.L. 1970, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 15.

6-26-4.
Usurious contracts — Penalty.

Every contract made in violation of any of the provisions of §

6-26-2

, and every mortgage, pledge, deposit, or assignment made or given as security for the performance of the contract, shall be usurious and void.

Nothing contained in this section shall affect the rights of an endorsee or transferee of a negotiable instrument who purchases the instrument before maturity, for value, and without notice of its usurious character.

Nothing contained in this section shall affect the rights, duties or liabilities of any persons acting under the provisions of title 19, and if the borrower shall, either before or after suit, make any payment on the contract, either of principal or interest, or of any part of either, and whether to the lender or to any assignee, endorsee, or transferee of the contract, the borrower shall be entitled to recover from the lender the amount so paid in an action of the case. Receipts shall be given whenever payments are made of either principal or interest.

The provisions previously stated in this section shall not apply to any financial institution and its subsidiaries, credit union, or bank holding company and its subsidiaries, organized under the laws of the state; any other entity regulated by the department of business regulation; a national bank and its subsidiaries; federal savings and loan association or federal credit union; or a bank, company, or association collectively and individually referred to as a regulated financial institution. In the event a regulated financial institution knowingly contracts or charges a usurious rate of interest in violation of any of the provisions of §

6-26-2

, it shall forfeit the entire interest on the debt. In case the usurious rate of interest has been paid, the person by whom it has been paid, or his or her legal representative, may recover from the regulated financial institution in an action in the nature of an action on the debt, twice the amount of the interest so paid, provided that the action is commenced within two (2) years from the time the usurious transaction occurred.

History of Section.

P.L. 1909, ch. 434, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 228, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 485, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

6-26-4

; P.L. 1982, ch. 437, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 58; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 15.

Parties in Pari Delicto.

Fact that plaintiff seeking to recover payment made to defendant under usurious note had taken a usurious note from a third party did not render plaintiff and defendant in pari delicto so as to defeat plaintiff’s right of recovery where plaintiff’s contract with the third party had no relation to the contract between plaintiff and defendant. Burdon v. Unrath,

46 R.I. 89

, 125 A. 204,

1924 R.I. LEXIS 52

(1924).

6-26-5.
Pawnbrokers exempt.

Sections

6-26-2

—

6-26-4

shall not apply to loans made by duly licensed pawnbrokers on the security of a deposit of personal property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1909, ch. 434, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 228, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 485, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

6-26-5

.

6-26-6.
Damages and interest on foreign protested bill of exchange.

Whenever any foreign bill of exchange is or shall be drawn or endorsed within this state for the payment of any sum of money, and the bill is or shall be returned from any place or country outside the limits of the United States protested for nonacceptance or nonpayment, the drawer or endorser shall be subject to the payment of ten percent (10%) damages on the bill and charges for protest and the bill shall carry an interest of six percent (6%) per annum from the date of the protest.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 166, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 201, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 228, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 456, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 6-23-1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 15.

6-26-7.
Action on foreign protested bill.

Any person having a right to demand any sum of money upon a foreign protested bill of exchange as stated in §

6-26-6

may commence and prosecute an action for principal, damages, interest, and charges of protest against the drawers and endorsers, jointly or severally, or against either of them separately; and judgment shall and may be given for the principal, damages, charges, and interest upon the principal after the rate established in §

6-26-6

, to the time of the judgment, together with costs of suit.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 166, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 201, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 228, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 456, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 6-23-2; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 19; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 15.

6-26-8.
Damages and interest on inland protested bill.

Whenever any inland bill of exchange shall be drawn or endorsed within this state for the payment of any sum of money outside this state, and the bill shall be protested for nonacceptance or nonpayment, the drawer or endorser shall be subject to the payment of five percent (5%) damages on the bill and charges of protest, and the bill shall carry an interest of six percent (6%) per annum from the date of the protest.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 166, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 201, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 228, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 456, § 3; G.L. 1956, § 6-23-3.

6-26-9.
Penalty for possession of records of usurious transactions.

Any person who shall, with knowledge of the contents, have in his or her possession any document, record, paper, instrument, or other writing that shall record or evidence a usurious debt in violation of the provisions of §

6-26-2

, shall be imprisoned for not more than one year or fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 263, § 2.

6-26-10.
Possession of usury records — Evidence of knowledge.

The possession by any person, other than a public official in the course of his or her duty, of any document, record, paper, instrument, or other writing that shall record or evidence a usurious debt in violation of §

6-26-2

shall be presumptive evidence of possession with knowledge of its contents in violation of §

6-26-9

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 263, § 2.